California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A survivor, or a designated representative of a survivor, may submit a device protection request to an account manager seeking to terminate a perpetrator’s access to a connected device or associated user account.

(b) A device protection request shall include all of the following:

(1) A verification that the perpetrator has committed or allegedly committed a covered act against the survivor or an individual in the survivor’s care, by providing either of the following:

(A) A copy of a signed affidavit from a licensed medical or mental health care
 provider, licensed military medical or mental health care provider, licensed social worker, victim services provider, or licensed military victim services provider, a temporary restraining order, an emergency protective order, or a protective order lawfully issued pursuant to Section 527.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code, or Section 136.2 of the Penal Code.

(B) A copy of a police report, statements provided by police, including military police, to magistrates or judges, charging documents, protective or restraining orders, military protective orders, or any other official record that documents the covered act, including a copy of a written report by a peace officer employed by a state or local law enforcement agency acting in the
 peace officer’s official capacity stating that the individual has filed a report alleging victimization of an act or crime. 

(2) Verification of the survivor’s exclusive legal possession or control of the connected device, including, but not limited to, a dissolution decree, temporary restraining order, protective order, domestic violence restraining order, or other document indicating the survivor’s exclusive use care, possession, or control of the connected device.

(3) Identification of the connected device or devices.

(4) Identification of the person that the requester seeks to deny device or account access.

(c) An account manager shall offer a survivor or
 a designated representative of a survivor the ability to submit a device protection request under subdivision (b) through secure remote means that are easily navigable. Except as specified under subdivision (b), an account manager shall not require a specific form of documentation to submit a device protection request.

(d) Within two business days of receiving a complete device protection request, the account manager shall do one of the following:

(1) Terminate or disable the identified perpetrator’s access to the connected device or user account, and notify the survivor or their representative that access has been successfully denied.

(2) Inform the survivor, in a clear and conspicuous manner, of any methods to reset the device to factory settings or to a similar state that removes all account holders. A reset method is one that does not require the survivor to possess a personal identification number (PIN), password, or other access credential, and shall be available solely by virtue of the survivor’s physical proximity to the
 device.

(e) An account manager shall clearly describe the process under this section to submit a device protection request, including required documentation and available remedies, on its internet website and any associated mobile application.

(f) An account manager shall not require any of the following as a condition for processing a device protection request:

(1) Payment of a fee, penalty, or other charge for the survivor or a designated representative of the survivor to submit a request, or for the account manager to carry out the request.

(2) Approval of the device protection request by any person who has device or account access that is not the survivor.

(3) An increase in the rate charged for the account if any
 subscription fee or other recurring charge for account access applies.

(4) Any other requirement not listed under subdivision (b).

(g) An account manager shall not deny a device protection request due to arrears accrued by the account or associated with the connected device.

(h) An account manager shall not notify the perpetrator of the access termination and shall not disclose any data, credentials, or account changes relating to the survivor or any new account created after the perpetrator’s access is removed.

(i) A survivor shall not be financially responsible for any amount incurred or charged to the connected device or associated account by
 the perpetrator after the perpetrator’s access has been terminated under this chapter.

(j) (1) An account manager and any officer, director, employee, vendor, or agent thereof shall treat any information submitted by a survivor or a designated representative of a survivor under this section as confidential and securely dispose of the information not later than 90 days after receiving the information.

(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall be construed to prohibit an account manager from maintaining, for longer than the period specified in that paragraph, a record that verifies that a survivor or a designated representative of a survivor fulfilled the conditions of a device protection request under subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.32.

(a) (1) An account manager that fails to deny a perpetrator access in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 22948.31 or otherwise does not comply with the requirements described in Section 22948.31 shall be deemed in violation of this chapter.

(2) A perpetrator that maintains or exercises device or account access, including by disturbing the peace of the other party, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 6320 of the Family Code, despite having their device or account access denied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22948.31, shall be deemed in violation of this chapter.

(b) (1) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter may be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction in a civil action brought by any person injured by the violation or in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney, county counsel, a city attorney, or a city prosecutor.

(2) A court may enjoin a person or entity who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in a violation of this chapter. The court may make any orders or judgments as may be necessary to prevent or remedy a violation of this chapter.

(3) A person or entity who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in a violation of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars
 ($2,500) per violation for each connected device in violation of this chapter. If multiple violations of this chapter are alleged in any civil action, they shall be specifically alleged, and a court of competent jurisdiction shall make specific findings as to each violation. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, the penalty shall be deposited into the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by a person injured by the violation, the penalty shall be awarded to that person.

(c) The prevailing plaintiff in any action commenced
 under this section shall be entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.33.

Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.34.

(a) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(b) The remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.35.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any entity that is subject to the federal Safe Connections Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-223) or regulations of the Federal Communications Commission adopted pursuant to the authority of that law, shall not be subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.36.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an entity that is subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 28200) of Division 12 of the Vehicle Code shall not be subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.37.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 36. In-Vehicle Cameras [22948.50. - 22948.59.]

22948.50.

(a) A manufacturer of a new motor vehicle model that is equipped standard with one or more in-vehicle cameras that is sold or leased in this state shall disclose that fact in the owner’s manual for the vehicle. If a vehicle is equipped with one or more in-vehicle cameras and the camera does not come standard with the vehicle model, the manufacturer shall disclose that the vehicle is equipped with one or more in-vehicle cameras in a document sent to the dealer of the vehicle, which may include the vehicle specification sheet.

(b) (1) A dealer shall not provide for the sale or lease of a new motor vehicle equipped with one or more in-vehicle cameras
 in this state without prominently informing, during the purchase of the vehicle, and in accordance with the procedures of paragraphs (2) and (3), either the user or the person designated by the user to purchase the vehicle. 

(2) Prior to the execution of the conditional sales contract for a vehicle, the dealer shall provide to the user, or the person designated by the user to purchase the vehicle, a separate disclosure, either written or electronic, acknowledging the existence and operation of an in-vehicle camera in the purchased vehicle, and shall obtain the written or electronic signature of the user or purchaser on that disclosure. The disclosure shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) Be contained on a
 single document or single internet website that is separate from the conditional sales contract, purchase order, and any other document.

(B) Contain the following language, written in at least 20-point bold type:
“This vehicle may be equipped with an in-vehicle camera capable of recording the driver and other individuals inside the vehicle. For more information about the in-vehicle camera please consult your automotive dealer, the vehicle manufacturer, or the vehicle owner’s manual. The manufacturer is required to notify the dealer about an in-vehicle camera in the owner’s manual, specification sheet, or other document. A buyer or lessee of a vehicle has a right to review the owner’s manual or any other provided document prior to purchase to determine if an
 in-vehicle camera exists. For more information about the in-vehicle camera, please consult your automotive dealer, the vehicle manufacturer, or the vehicle owner’s manual. If a manufacturer or other person or entity obtains or shares any video or photographs without your consent and in violation of law, they may be subject to legal action, including, but not limited to, via a county district attorney, the state attorney general, or otherwise as described in Sections 22948.51 and 22948.55 of the Business and Professions Code.

By law, signing this acknowledgment form does not waive any rights of the user or constitute consent to a manufacturer to share, sell, or
 retain any images or videos captured by the in-vehicle camera.”
(C) Include a signature or acknowledgment box that the buyer or lessee, or their representative, has reviewed the disclosure language identified in subparagraph (B) and understands their right to review, before purchasing or leasing the vehicle, the vehicle owner’s manual and any other information provided by the manufacturer pertaining to in-vehicle cameras.

(3) A buyer or lessee of a vehicle has a right to review the owner’s manual or any other document, if any is provided by the manufacturer, prior to purchase to determine if an in-vehicle camera exists.

(c) A dealer shall not be held liable for a violation of
 subdivision (b) if the manufacturer of that vehicle is in violation of subdivision (a) with respect to that vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.51.

(a) Any image or video recording collected or retained through the operation of an in-vehicle camera shall not be:

(1) Used for any advertising.

(2) Sold to a third party.

(3) Shared with a third party unless any of the following apply:

(A) The user has provided affirmative prior consent, and all of the following requirements are met: 

(i) Recipients of images or video recordings shared pursuant to this subparagraph
 do not use the images or video recordings for any purpose other than a purpose affirmatively consented to by the consumer, do not share or transmit the images or video recordings, and do not retain the images or video recordings longer than reasonably necessary to fulfill the purpose for which they were shared.

(ii) The user receives clear, meaningful notice prior to the sharing of the images or video recordings, including the party or parties with whom the images or recordings will be shared, and the purpose for which the images or recordings will be shared.

(B) (i) The images or video recordings are shared with a third party only to the extent necessary to diagnose, service, or repair the in-vehicle camera or vehicle equipment that relies on or utilizes the
 in-vehicle camera, or improve portions of a vehicle’s safety system that rely on or utilize the in-vehicle camera.

(ii) Recipients of images or video recordings shared pursuant to this subparagraph do not use the images or video recordings for any purpose other than a purpose specified in clause (i), do not share or transmit the images or video recordings, and do not retain the images or video recordings longer than reasonably necessary to fulfill the purpose for which they were shared.

(C) The images or video recordings are shared with a third party in order to comply with a valid verifiable consumer request pursuant to Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. 

(D) The
 images or video recordings are shared with a third party pursuant to a records request, including, but not limited to, a request pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 832.7 of the Penal Code or Section 7923.625 of the Government Code or Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) Retained at any location, other than the vehicle itself, unless
 either of the following apply:

(A) The user has provided affirmative prior consent.

(B) The images or video recordings are retained only to the extent necessary to diagnose, service, or repair the in-vehicle camera or vehicle equipment that relies on or utilizes the in-vehicle camera, or improve portions of a vehicle’s safety system that rely on or utilize the in-vehicle camera.

(5) Downloaded, retrieved, or otherwise accessed by a person or entity other than the user, unless either of the following apply:

(A) The user has provided affirmative prior consent.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), the images or video recordings are retained only to the extent necessary to diagnose, service, or repair the in-vehicle camera or vehicle equipment that relies on or utilizes the in-vehicle camera, or improve portions of a vehicle’s safety system that rely on or utilize the in-vehicle camera.

(ii) The person or entity that downloads, retrieves, or otherwise accesses the images or recordings does not use the images or video recordings for any purpose other than the purpose specified in clause (i), does not share or transmit the images or video recordings, and does not retain the images or video recordings longer than reasonably necessary to fulfill the purpose for which they were shared.

(b) (1) A person or entity that provides
 the operation of an in-vehicle camera in this state shall provide effective mechanisms, without any cost, penalty, or unnecessary steps, for a consumer to revoke their consent pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) after it is given. At least one of these mechanisms shall utilize the primary medium through which the person or entity communicates with users.

(2) A person or entity subject to paragraph (1) shall honor the user’s consent revocation, and shall delete from all locations other than the vehicle itself any image or recording associated with that user that has been collected, retained, downloaded, or retrieved by that person or entity under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (a), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), as soon as practicable, but not later than 30 days after the user revokes consent.

(c) A person or entity shall not discriminate against a user because the user has exercised any of their rights under this chapter. Discriminatory acts shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Denying goods, services, or benefits to the user.

(2) Charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of discounts or other incentives or imposing penalties.

(3) Providing a different level or quality of goods,
 services, or benefits to the user.

(4) Suggesting that the user will receive a different price or rate for goods, services, or benefits, or a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits.

(5) Considering the user’s exercise of rights under this chapter as a basis for suspicion of criminal wrongdoing or unlawful conduct.

(d) Images or video recordings retained through the operation of an in-vehicle camera may be retrieved or shared without the user’s permission if any of the following apply:

(1) In a court, arbitration, or other judicial or administrative authority, the video recordings are subject to the standards for
 admission into evidence required by that court, arbitrator, or other administrative authority.

(2) (A) The images or video recordings are retrieved pursuant to an investigation or inspection authorized under Section 1131(a) or 30166 of Title 49 of the United States Code, and the personal information of an owner or a lessee of the vehicle, including the vehicle identification number, is not disclosed in connection with the video recordings retrieved pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a vehicle identification number may be disclosed to the manufacturer or other entity responsible for providing the images or video recordings pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(3) The images or video recordings are retrieved for the purpose of immediately determining the need for, or facilitating, emergency medical response to a motor vehicle crash.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, any image or video recording collected or retained through the operation of an in-vehicle camera may be shared with a third party, retained at a location other than the vehicle, or downloaded, retrieved, or otherwise accessed by a person or entity other than the user to comply with a preservation request pursuant to Chapter 119 or 121 of Title 18 of the United States Code, or a lawful subpoena, court order, or search warrant.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be construed to relieve a person or entity from compliance with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 1546) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code), including, but not limited to, Section 1546.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.52.

A person or entity shall not compel a manufacturer or other entity providing the operation of an in-vehicle camera to build specific features for the purpose of allowing an investigative or law enforcement officer to monitor communications through that feature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.53.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply: 

(a) (1) “Affirmative prior consent” means a user’s freely given, informed, and unambiguous affirmative authorization for the prospective sharing or retention of their in-vehicle camera recordings or images, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51, in one of the following forms:

(A) A page on the vehicle manufacturer’s internet website clearly dedicated to privacy where the user can acknowledge their consent to have their in-vehicle camera recordings
 or images shared or retained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51. This acknowledgment of consent shall not be given in combination with any other acknowledgment, consent, or agreement.

(B) A user’s response to a mail form sent by the vehicle manufacturer and returned by the user with their signature acknowledging their consent to have their in-vehicle camera recordings or images shared or retained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51.

(C) A user’s signature on a written or electronic form, at the time of the vehicle purchase, acknowledging their consent to have their in-vehicle camera recordings or images shared or retained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51. The form shall be contained on a single document or single internet page, written in
 at least 20-point bold font, that is separate from the conditional sales contract, purchase order, or any other document or internet page.

(D) A dedicated prompt displayed on a screen located on the vehicle’s center console which allows the user to acknowledge their consent to have their in-vehicle camera recordings or images shared or retained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51. The prompt shall meet all of the following criteria:

(i) Outline the limited sharing or retention for which the user may give consent under subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51, and provide a description of how the user may acknowledge or revoke consent in the future.

(ii) Only allow the user to give consent pursuant to the provisions
 of subdivision (a) of Section 22948.51, and shall not be used to provide consent for any other purpose or be used in
 conjunction with any other separate acknowledgment of consent.

(iii) Be displayed to the user only in any of the following instances:

(I) The initial setup of the vehicle during or after purchase.

(II) When diagnoses, service, or repair of the in-vehicle camera, or vehicle equipment that relies on or utilizes the in-vehicle camera, is required.

(III) When the user chooses, through a setting on the vehicle’s center console, to view the prompt for the purpose of acknowledging or revoking consent.

(2) “Affirmative prior consent” shall not include any of the following:

(A) Acceptance of a general or broad terms of use, or similar document, that contains descriptions of sharing or retention of in-vehicle camera recordings or images along with other, unrelated information.

(B) Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content in an electronic format.

(C) Agreement obtained through a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decisionmaking, or choice.

(b) “Dealer” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 285 of the Vehicle Code. 

(c) “In-vehicle camera” means any device included
 as part of a vehicle by the manufacturer that is designed to, or is capable of, recording images or video inside the cabin of the vehicle.

(d) “Personal information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer, household, or consumer device. 

(e) “User” means a person who originally purchases, leases, or takes ownership of a vehicle equipped with an in-vehicle camera. A person who is incidentally recorded when a vehicle is operated by a user shall not be deemed to be a user.

(f) “Vehicle manufacturer” or “manufacturer” has
 the same meaning as set forth in Section 672 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.54.

Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.55.

(a) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter may be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney. This chapter shall not be deemed to create a private right of action, or limit any existing private right of action. 

(b) A court may enjoin a person who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in a violation of this chapter. The court may make any orders or judgments as may be necessary to prevent a violation of this chapter. 

(c) A person who knowingly engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in a violation of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each vehicle equipped with an in-vehicle camera sold or leased in violation of this chapter. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, the penalty shall be deposited into the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.56.

The remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.57.

(a) This chapter does not reduce the rights afforded to a consumer or the obligations imposed on a business pursuant to any applicable state or federal law for the protection of individual privacy.

(b) In the event of a conflict between this chapter and any other state law, the provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection for the right of privacy for consumers shall control.

(c) The rights afforded to consumers and the obligations imposed on any business pursuant to this chapter do not apply to the extent that they infringe on the noncommercial activities of a person or entity described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.58.

(a) This chapter shall not apply to cameras installed in vehicles that are primarily for commercial use, including buses, as defined in Section 233 of the Vehicle Code, motortrucks, as defined in Section 410 of the Vehicle Code, and truck tractors, as defined in Section 655 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the sale or advertising for commercial use of any image or video depicting a commercial driver without their consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.59.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 296)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 37. Gene Therapy Kits: Notice [22949.50. - 22949.51.]

22949.50.

Except as permitted by federal law, a person shall not sell a gene therapy kit in this state unless the seller includes a notice on the seller’s internet website in a conspicuous location that is displayed to the consumer prior to the point of sale, and on a label on the package containing the gene therapy kit, in plain view and readily legible, stating that the kit is not for self-administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   (SB 180)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.51.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Gene therapy” refers to the administration of genetic material to modify or manipulate the expression of a gene product, or to alter the biological properties of living cells, for therapeutic use.

(b) “Gene therapy kit” refers to a product that is sold as a collection of materials for the purpose of facilitating gene therapy experiments, including, but not limited to, a system for the targeted cutting of DNA molecules, such as type II clustered regularly interspaced short palindromic repeats (CRISPR), associated proteins (CRISPR-Cas) systems,
 including CRISPR-Cas9, as described in Regents of University of California v. Broad Institute, Inc. (2018) 903 F.3d 1286.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   (SB 180)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 38. Persons Engaged in the Manufacture, Distribution, Importation, Transportation, Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Firearms and Precursor Parts [22949.60. - 22949.71.]

22949.60.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the proliferation of assault weapons, .50 BMG rifles, and unserialized firearms poses a threat to the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and visitors to, this state. All Californians are directly harmed by the proliferation of these weapons and this state has a compelling state interest in protecting its citizens from gun violence and from intimidation by persons brandishing these weapons. Further, this state has a compelling interest in enabling law enforcement authorities to trace firearms used, manufactured, distributed, or transported unlawfully.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the proliferation of firearms to and among young people poses a threat to the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and visitors to, this state. Firearms are especially dangerous in the hands of young people because current research and scientific evidence show that young people are more impulsive, more likely to engage in risky and reckless behavior, unduly influenced by peer pressure, motivated more by rewards than costs or negative consequences, less likely to consider the future consequences of their actions and decisions, and less able to control themselves in emotionally arousing situations. In recognition of these facts, the Legislature has previously prohibited licensed firearm dealers from selling a firearm to a person under 21 years of age, subject to certain exemptions. This state has a compelling interest in further restricting the proliferation of firearms among those under
 21 years of age.

(c) The Legislature has previously restricted assault weapons based upon finding that each such firearm has such a high rate of
 fire and capacity for firepower that its function as a legitimate sports or recreational firearm is substantially outweighed by the danger that it can be used to kill and injure human beings. The Legislature has also previously restricted .50 BMG rifles based upon finding that they pose a clear and present threat to the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and visitors to, this state, because those firearms have such a high capacity for long-distance and highly destructive firepower that they pose an unacceptable risk of death and serious injury of human beings, destruction or serious damage of vital public and private buildings, civilian, police and military vehicles, power generation and transmission facilities, petrochemical production and storage facilities, and transportation infrastructure. Each of these previous findings is readopted. The Legislature further finds and
 declares that the manufacture, distribution, transport, importation, and sale of unserialized firearms poses a threat to the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and visitors to, this state, and impedes law enforcement activities, and that the manufacture, distribution, transport, importation, and sale of firearm precursor parts and kits is contributing to the proliferation of unserialized firearms in the state.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to further restrict in this state the manufacture, distribution, transportation, importation,
 sale, lending, and transfer of assault weapons, .50 BMG rifles, and unserialized firearms, and further restrict the proliferation of firearms to and among those under 21 years of age, by creating new civil law prohibitions and a civil enforcement mechanism, independent of existing law. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit in any way the enforceability of existing laws concerning firearms, including, but not limited to, Part 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.61.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “.50 BMG rifle” means a center fire rifle that can fire a .50 BMG cartridge and is not already an assault weapon or a machinegun. “.50 BMG rifle” does not include any antique firearm, nor any curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) (1) “Assault weapon” means the following designated semiautomatic firearms:

(A) All of the following specified rifles:

(i) All AK series, including, but not limited to, the models identified as follows:

(I) Made in China AK, AKM, AKS, AK47, AK47S, 56, 56S, 84S, and 86S.

(II) Norinco 56, 56S, 84S, and 86S.

(III) Poly Technologies AKS and AK47.

(IV) MAADI AK47 and ARM.

(ii) UZI and Galil.

(iii) Beretta AR-70.

(iv) CETME Sporter.

(v) Colt AR-15 series.

(vi) Daewoo K-1, K-2, Max 1, Max 2, AR 100, and AR 110C.

(vii) Fabrique Nationale FAL, LAR, FNC, 308 Match, and
 Sporter.

(viii) MAS 223.

(ix) HK-91, HK-93, HK-94, and HK-PSG-1.

(x) The following MAC types:

(I) RPB Industries Inc. sM10 and sM11.

(II) SWD Incorporated M11.

(xi) SKS with detachable magazine.

(xii) SIG AMT, PE-57, SG 550, and SG 551.

(xiii) Springfield Armory BM59 and SAR-48.

(xiv) Sterling MK-6.

(xv) Steyer AUG.

(xvi) Valmet M62S, M71S, and M78S.

(xvii) Armalite AR-180.

(xviii) Bushmaster Assault Rifle.

(xix) Calico M-900.

(xx) J&R ENG M-68.

(xxi) Weaver Arms Nighthawk.

(B) All of the following specified pistols:

(i) UZI.

(ii) Encom MP-9 and MP-45.

(iii) The following
 MAC types:

(I) RPB Industries Inc. sM10 and sM11.

(II) SWD Incorporated M-11.

(III) Advance Armament Inc. M-11.

(IV) Military Armament Corp. Ingram M-11.

(V) Intratec TEC-9.

(VI) Sites Spectre.

(VII) Sterling MK-7.

(VIII) Calico M-950.

(IX) Bushmaster Pistol.

(C) All of the following
 specified shotguns:

(i) Franchi SPAS 12 and LAW 12.

(ii) Striker 12.

(iii) The Streetsweeper type S/S Inc. SS/12.

(D) Any firearm declared to be an assault weapon by the court pursuant to former Section 12276.5 of the Penal Code, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, which is specified as an assault weapon in a list promulgated pursuant to former Section 12276.5 of the Penal Code, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991.

(E) Any firearm included in the
 list promulgated by the Attorney General pursuant to former Section 12276.5 of the Penal Code, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, and any other models that are only variations of those weapons with minor differences, regardless of the manufacturer. The Legislature has defined assault weapons as the types, series, and models listed in this paragraph because it was the most effective way to identify and restrict a specific class of semiautomatic weapons.

(F) As used in this paragraph, “series” includes all other models that are only variations, with minor differences, of those models listed in subparagraph (A), regardless of the manufacturer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “assault weapon” also means any of the following:

(i) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(I) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(II) A thumbhole stock.

(III) A folding or telescoping stock.

(IV) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(V) A flash suppressor.

(VI) A forward pistol grip.

(ii) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with
 the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(iii) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(iv) A semiautomatic pistol that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(I) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer.

(II) A second handgrip.

(III) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(IV) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(v) A semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(vi) A semiautomatic shotgun that has both of the following:

(I) A folding or telescoping stock.

(II) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon, thumbhole stock, or vertical handgrip.

(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that does not have a fixed magazine.
